Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 2 State Board of Pharmacy

26-4-20.
State Board of Pharmacy continued; enforcement of provisions of chapter vested in board; board to be autonomous division of Department of Community Health; compensation; venue for actions involving board members.

The Georgia State Board of Pharmacy existing immediately preceding July 1, 2013, is continued in existence, and members serving on the board immediately preceding that date shall continue to serve out their terms of office and until their respective successors are appointed and qualified.

The responsibility for enforcement of the provisions of this chapter shall be vested in the Georgia State Board of Pharmacy. The board shall have all of the duties, powers, and authority specifically granted by or necessary for the enforcement of this chapter, as well as such other duties, powers, and authority as it may be granted from time to time by applicable law.

On and after July 1, 2013, the board shall not be under the jurisdiction of the Secretary of State but shall be a division of the Department of Community Health; provided, however, that except as otherwise specifically provided, the board shall be autonomous from the Board of Community Health and the commissioner of community health and shall exercise its quasi-judicial, rule-making, licensing, or policy-making functions independently of the department and without approval or control of the department and prepare its budget and submit its budgetary requests, if any, through the department. Such transfer shall in no way affect any existing obligations, liabilities, or rights of the board, as such existed on June 30, 2013. The board shall have with respect to all matters within the jurisdiction of the board as provided under this chapter the powers, duties, and functions of professional licensing boards as provided in Chapter 1 of Title 43.

The board shall appoint and fix the compensation, which shall be approved by the Board of Community Health, of an executive director of such board who shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

The venue of any action involving members of the board shall be the county in which is found the primary office of the board. The executive director of the board shall not be considered a member of the board in determining the venue of any such action, and no court shall have jurisdiction over any such action solely by virtue of the executive director residing or maintaining a residence within its jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 192, § 1-2/HB 132.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “July 1, 2013” for “July 1, 1998” in subsection (a); and added subsections (c) through (e).

26-4-21.
Eligibility requirements for board members; oath of office.

Each of the seven pharmacist members of the board shall, at the time of appointment:

Be a resident of this state for not less than six months;

Be currently licensed and in good standing to engage in the practice of pharmacy in this state;

Be actively engaged in the practice of pharmacy in this state;

Have five years of experience in the practice of pharmacy in this state after licensure; and

Not be officially employed as a full-time faculty member by any school or college of pharmacy.

The one consumer member of the board shall be a resident of Georgia who has attained the age of majority and shall not have any connection whatsoever with the pharmaceutical industry.

Appointees to the board shall immediately after their appointment take and subscribe to an oath or affirmation before a qualified officer that they will faithfully and impartially perform the duties of the office, and the oath shall be filed with the office of the Governor, whereupon the office of the Governor shall issue to each appointee a certificate of appointment.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 192, § 1-3/HB 132; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 26/HB 90.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “and the oath shall be filed with the Office of the Governor, whereupon the Office of the Governor” for “which oath shall be filed with the Secretary of State, whereupon the Secretary of State” in subsection (c).

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language in subsection (c).

26-4-22.
Number and terms of members; appointment; vacancies.

The board shall consist of seven members possessing the qualification specified in subsection (a) of Code Section 26-4-21 and one additional member possessing the qualifications specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 26-4-21 who shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate for a term of five years or until their successors are appointed and qualified. Pharmacist members shall represent a diversity of practice settings and geographic dispersion of practitioners across this state.

At the annual meeting of the Georgia Pharmacy Association, there may be nominated by such licensed pharmacists as may be present three practicing registered pharmacists who shall meet the qualifications imposed by subsection (a) of Code Section 26-4-21 to fill the next vacancy occurring on the board, except a vacancy in the consumer member position on said board, by reason of expiration of term. The secretary of said association may regularly submit to the Governor the names of the three pharmacists so nominated and the Governor may make the appointment to fill such vacancy from the names so submitted. Should any vacancy occur upon the board, other than in the consumer member position on the board and other than by reason of expiration of term, such vacancy may be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired term from a group of three practicing registered pharmacists nominated as provided in this subsection at any regular or special meeting of the Georgia Pharmacy Association.

The consumer member of the board shall also be appointed by the Governor. Such member shall vote only on matters relating to administration and policy which do not directly relate to practical and scientific examination of pharmacists for licensing in Georgia. Vacancies occurring in the membership of the board occupied by a consumer shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term of office.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 192, § 1-4/HB 132.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in subsection (a), inserted “and confirmed by the Senate” near the middle, and substituted “this state” for “the state” near the end.

26-4-23.
Removal of board members.

Any member who has failed to attend three consecutive regular monthly meetings of the board for any reason other than illness of such member shall be subject to removal by the Governor upon request of the board. The president of the board shall notify the Governor in writing when any such member has failed to attend three consecutive regular monthly meetings. Any member of the board may be removed by the Governor in the same manner as provided in Code Section 43-1-17.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 192, § 1-5/HB 132.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, inserted “in the same manner” in the last sentence of this Code section.

26-4-24.
Meetings and organization; appeals; serving of notices and legal process.

The board shall meet at least annually to organize and elect a president and a vice president from its members. The vice president shall serve as the cognizant member of the board. All appeals from the decision of the board, all documents or applications required by law to be filed with the board, and any notice or legal process to be served upon the board may be filed with or served upon the executive director at his or her office in the county of domicile of the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1706, § 23; Ga. L. 2013, p. 192, § 1-6/HB 132.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in this Code section, substituted “vice president” for “vice-president” in the first sentence; deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The division director shall be the secretary of the board and shall have all the power, duties, and authority with reference to such board as shall be prescribed by Chapter 1 of Title 43 and shall perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the board.”; added the present second sentence, and in the third sentence, substituted “executive director” for “division director” and substituted “board” for “professional licensing boards division” at the end.

26-4-25.
Expense and mileage allowances; reimbursement of certain costs and fees.

Each member of the board may receive the expense allowance as provided by subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21 and the same mileage allowance for the use of a personal car as that received by other state officials and employees or a travel allowance of actual transportation costs if traveling by public carrier within this state. Each board member shall also be reimbursed for any conference or meeting registration fee incurred in the performance of his or her duties as a board member. For each day’s service outside of this state as a board member, such member shall receive actual expenses as an expense allowance as well as the mileage allowance for the use of a personal car equal to that received by other state officials and employees or a travel allowance of actual transportation costs if traveling by public carrier or by rental motor vehicle. Expense vouchers submitted by board members shall be subject to approval of the president and executive director. Out-of-state travel by board members shall be approved by the board president and the executive director.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 192, § 1-7/HB 132.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “Each member of the board shall be reimbursed as provided for in subsection (f) of Code Section 43-1-2.”

26-4-26.
Meetings; notice; quorum; open meetings.

To transact its business, the board shall hold regular meetings at least once each month unless, in the discretion of the president, it is deemed unnecessary for a particular month. The board shall meet at such additional times as it may determine. Such additional meetings may be called by the president of the board or by at least two-thirds of the members of the board.

Notice of all meetings of the board shall be given in the manner and pursuant to requirements prescribed by Chapter 14 of Title 50 relating to open meetings.

A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of a board meeting and, except where a greater number is required by this chapter or by any rule of the board, all actions of the board shall be by a majority of a quorum.

Meetings and hearings of the board shall be held at the site of the office of the board or at such other site as may be specified by the president of the board.

All board meetings and hearings shall be open to the public. The board may, in its discretion and according to law, conduct any portion of its meeting in executive session closed to the public.

Proceedings before the board wherein a licensee’s or permit holder’s right to practice pursuant to this chapter in this state is terminated, suspended, or limited or wherein a public reprimand is administered shall require prior notice to the licensee and an opportunity for hearing; and such proceedings shall be considered contested cases within the meaning of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” Neither refusal of a license or permit nor a private reprimand nor a letter of concern shall be considered a contested case within the meaning of Chapter 13 of Title 50; provided, however, that the applicant shall be allowed to appear before the board, if the applicant so requests, prior to the board making a final decision regarding the issuance of the license or permit. The power to subpoena as set forth in Chapter 13 of Title 50 shall include the power to subpoena any relevant book, writing, paper, or document. If any licensee or permit holder fails to appear at any hearing after reasonable notice, the board may proceed to hear the evidence against such licensee or permit holder and take action as if such licensee or permit holder had been present.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 192, § 1-8/HB 132.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the first sentence of subsection (a); added subsections (d) and (f); and redesignated former subsection (d) as present subsection (e).

26-4-27.
Authority to establish rules and regulations.

The board may establish such rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter and as in its judgment will best carry out the requirements thereof.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Hospital Pharmacy Regulations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia State Board of Pharmacy, Chapter 480-13.